Maine, session 132, LD830.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §484, sub-§11 is enacted to read:
11. Special provisions; solar energy development. In the case of a solar energy
development, the proposed development will be surrounded by a barrier, which may
include, but is not limited to, a fence, trees, bushes or other vegetation. The barrier must be
designed to sufficiently conceal the solar energy development from view from abutting
properties, as determined by the department.